Washington statutes.
RCW 18.138.090

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial of certificates, unauthorized practices, and the disciplining of certificate holders under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 1991 c 3 s 286; 1988 c 277 s 5.]